New Jersey, session 221, A4743.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  R.S.39:3-24 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-24.  (a) The chief administrator shall register farm tractors and traction equipment used for farm operation to travel upon the public highways. The fee for registration shall be $5 per annum, whether the registration is issued for the yearly period or only a portion thereof.  Traction equipment or farm tractors may draw farm machinery and implements while in transit from one farm to another without additional registration therefor. The chief administrator shall register utility task vehicles, not for hire, used exclusively for farm operation to travel upon the public highways.  The fee for registration shall be $5 per annum, whether the registration is issued for the yearly period or only a portion thereof. (b)   The chief administrator may register motor vehicles, not for hire, used exclusively as farm machinery or farm implements, to travel upon the public highways, from one farm, or portion thereof, to another farm, or portion thereof, both owned or managed by the registered owner of the vehicle or vehicles.  The fee for registration shall be $5 per annum, whether the registration is issued for a yearly period or only a portion thereof.  Any vehicle registered and any truck, van, sport utility vehicle, or similar vehicle registered pursuant to the provisions of R.S.39:3-25 may draw not more than one vehicle used exclusively on the farm and a vehicle so drawn need not be registered.  A vehicle registered pursuant to this section or R.S.39:3-25 may be used under contract with a municipality to remove snow upon a public highway. (c)   No vehicle registered pursuant to this section shall be operated on a public highway at any time from sunset to sunrise, except a vehicle being operated under contract with a municipality to remove snow or a vehicle equipped with proper safety lighting during the three hours before sunrise and the three hours after sunset.  Every vehicle registered pursuant to this section, when operated on a public highway, shall have means adequate to control the movement of, to stop, and to hold the vehicle on any up or down grade and shall be operated in accordance with uniform rules and regulations prescribed by the chief administrator.  The rules and regulations shall specify the coverings that may be used on the wheels of vehicles registered pursuant to this section; the days, hours, and conditions under which vehicles registered pursuant to this section can be operated; the circumstance under which escort vehicles shall be required; the distance that may be traveled upon the public highways, which shall not be less than 50 miles; and vehicle equipment or other requirements or restrictions as may be necessary to protect the safety of the users of the public highways. Motor vehicles, not for hire, which are used exclusively as farm tractors, traction equipment, farm machinery, or farm implements which cannot be operated at a speed in excess of 35 miles per hour shall not be required to be registered under this section. (d)   A slow moving vehicle emblem shall be affixed, in the manner prescribed by the chief administrator pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2015, c.292 (C.39:3-24.2), to the rear of any motor vehicle, not for hire, used exclusively as a farm tractor, traction equipment, farm machinery, or farm implement, and any farm tractor, traction equipment, farm machinery, or farm implement drawn by a motor vehicle when operated on the roadways of this State.  A motor vehicle, not for hire, used exclusively as a farm tractor, traction equipment, farm machinery, or farm implement or any farm tractor, traction equipment, farm machinery, or farm implement drawn by a motor vehicle shall not be operated on the roadways of this State unless a slow moving vehicle emblem is displayed in the manner prescribed by the chief administrator pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2015, c.292 (C.39:3-24.2). (e)   As used in this section[, the term]: "[sport] Sport utility vehicle" means any vehicle that is designed to be used both on and off roadways and is equipped with available all wheel drive and raised ground clearance. Utility task vehicle means any motorized utility or off-road vehicle with four wheels designed with seating for the operator and one or more passengers, sideby-side, and a steering wheel for steering control. (cf: P.L.2015, c.292, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.